Missouri, session 2026, SB1526.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 643.263 and 643.265, RSMo, are
repealed and one new section enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as section 643.263, to read as follows:
643.263. 1. Each public school district and private
or parochial school in Missouri shall [report to the
department of health and senior services] maintain any
reports relating to the results of the examination of its
structures for friable asbestos as required by the
Environmental Protection Agency under the Toxic Substances
Control Act, PL 94-469. [All such reports shall be filed
with the department of health and senior services before
March 1, 1987.] Other political subdivisions shall [assess]
maintain assessments relating to asbestos in buildings
owned, leased or operated by the political subdivisions and
[report] reports relating to the results of the examination
of its structures for friable asbestos [to the department of
health and senior services by December 31, 1991]. The
results of the assessment shall be public information and
shall be readily available to the public and employees of
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1526 2
each political subdivision and each school district and
private and parochial school.
2. If the assessment indicates the presence of
asbestos-containing materials, the report shall identify the
location of all materials containing asbestos, the location
and square footage of friable asbestos, the average number
of persons exposed, the percent of asbestos found in the
material, the test used to assess the material and plans for
management of any friable asbestos. The report shall also
describe any plans for interim measures, such as treating or
covering friable asbestos, to be taken pending management of
the material. Any political subdivision, any school
district and any private or parochial school which adopts
interim measures or which has not completed its management
plan shall reevaluate the material biennially and report its
findings [to the department of health and senior services
and make its findings available] to its employees and the
public. Any political subdivision, any school district and
any private or parochial school which identifies nonfriable
asbestos shall, no less often than every three years,
reevaluate the material and report its findings [to the
department of health and senior services and make its
findings available] to its employees and the public. [The
department of health and senior services shall provide
technical assistance including training, consultation and
inspection upon request to political subdivisions in
identifying buildings owned, leased or operated by political
subdivisions which have asbestos-containing materials.
3. The department of health and senior services shall
annually provide the department of elementary and secondary
education with a list of all public school districts whose
buildings contain friable asbestos.

SB 1526 3
4. The department of health and senior services shall,
in cooperation with the office of administration, assess
asbestos in buildings owned, operated or leased by the state
of Missouri and report its findings to the office of
administration.]
[643.265. The department of health and
senior services and the department of natural
resources shall develop an interagency agreement
establishing agency responsibilities and
procedures concerning asbestos reporting,
removal and treatment. The department of health
and senior services is hereby designated the
state agency for the administration of loans and
grants under the Asbestos School Hazard
Abatement Act of 1984, Public Law 98-377, and
other federally funded loan or grant programs
for the abatement of asbestos.]
✓